Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9
Workers' Compensation

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-8 may not apply to subchapter 9, which was enacted separately.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-4, 6-10, and §§ 11-9-501 to 11-9-529 may not apply to § 11-9-530 which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 11-9-101 — 11-9-115, 11-9-117, 11-9-118, and subchapters 2-10 may not apply to §§ 11-9-116, 11-9-517 and 11-9-518, which were enacted separately.

Cross References.

County employees, workers' compensation, § 14-26-101 et seq.

Municipal employees, workers' compensation, § 14-60-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Employers' liability, § 11-8-101 et seq.

Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.

Workmen's compensation laws, Ark. Const. Amend. 26.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 162, § 3: Feb. 26, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present Workmen's Compensation laws provide for coverage of self-employed employers, and that clarification thereof is necessary to enable officers of a corporation to exclude themselves from coverage under Workmen's Compensation laws. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 18: Section 2 effective Sept. 1, 1976.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 21: Feb. 13, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workmen's Compensation law are inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living and should be increased immediately to meet said increase in the cost of living; that certain other provisions should be clarified or modified, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 119, § 3: Feb. 13, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present Workers' Compensation law a sole proprietor or partner is not eligible to obtain worker's compensation coverage for himself; that the inability to obtain such coverage is creating a serious hardship on such sole proprietors and partners as well as general contractors for whom they provide services; that this Act is designed to alleviate this problem by enabling such persons to obtain workers' compensation coverage and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 253, § 12: Mar. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Workers' Compensation law are in urgent need of revision to more clearly define the benefits to be provided by Worker's Compensation coverage; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 290, § 17: Mar. 3, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the provisions of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation law and to provide improved benefits for persons qualifying under this Act; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and improved benefits and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 631, § 5: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that the law as to permissible cross appeals to the Workers' Compensation Commission and the Arkansas Court of Appeals is ambiguous and must be clarified immediately to eliminate the possibility of inequitable treatment of parties before these tribunals; that Section 20 of the Workers' Compensation Act should be immediately amended to eliminate internal inconsistency in the Act; and that the scope of the Commission's authority to award attorneys fees on a lump sum is unclear and must be immediately clarified. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15: July 1, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased benefits and improvements in the administration of the Workers' Compensation system in Arkansas is in the best interest of employees, employers, the public in general; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 1987, No. 524, § 4: Aug. 1, 1987.

Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1227 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1997, No. 479, § 16: Mar. 13, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the limited liability company statute and other acts relating to pass through entities and related laws need amending in order to better reflect the intent and operation of those laws as originally drafted and to be consistent with current trends. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.

“Notwithstanding the foregoing, SECTION 10 of this act (§ 4-32-802(c)) shall only apply to limited liability companies in exsitence [sic] on the effective date of this act in the event an election is made with the Secretary of State to have this provision apply; otherwise, the original § 4-32-802(c) shall apply to limited liability companies existing on the effective date of this act.”

Acts 1997, No. 808, § 17: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1997; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1997. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 881, § 28: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present funeral pre-need laws, employee leasing firm laws, and other insurance laws are inadequate to protect the public. In pertinent part, the changes to the Insurance Code needed to assure the stability of funding for the Fraud Investigation Division of the Department must be enacted in the laws of this state well before the new fiscal year beginning July 1, 1999. The changes to authorized appropriations, as well as changes to the disability (health) insurance laws on individuals to conform to the federal laws on group policies with guaranteed renewability require immediate adoption; and unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1179, § 19: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 743, § 3: Mar. 13, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Insurance Code is in immediate need of revision to protect the insurance-buying consumers of this state; that the provisions of this act are essential to the successful operations and activities of the Insurance Fraud Investigation Division and the Worker's Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit of the Arkansas Insurance Department which are intended to provide protection to the insurance-buying consumers of this state; delay in the effective date of this act would work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1237, § 2: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Health, in response to the federal Homeland Security Act of 2002, will begin voluntary smallpox vaccinations of health care workers and public safety personnel on February 19, 2003, and participation in the voluntary program will be enhanced by clarification that an adverse reaction to vaccine will be compensable under the Workers' Compensation Law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1692, § 2: Apr. 5, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the objective evidence necessary to prove physical or anatomical impairment in worker's compensation cases needs to be clarified; that such changes need to be in effect immediately to provide for clarity with respect worker's compensation insurance coverage; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the health and safety of workers. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-9-101. Title — Purpose.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Law”.

The primary purposes of the workers' compensation laws are to pay timely temporary and permanent disability benefits to all legitimately injured workers who suffer an injury or disease arising out of and in the course of their employment, to pay reasonable and necessary medical expenses resulting therefrom, and then to return the worker to the work force; to improve workplace safety through safety programs; to improve health care delivery through use of managed care concepts; to encourage the return to work of injured workers; to deter and punish frauds of agents, brokers, solicitors, employers, and employees relating to procurement of workers' compensation coverage or the provision or denial of benefits; to curtail the rise in medical costs associated with the provision of workers' compensation benefits; and to emphasize that the workers' compensation system in this state must be returned to a state of economic viability.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 1, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1301; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 1; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As amended by Acts 1993, No. 796, § 1, this section provided, in part:

“Any and all case law inconsistent with the purposes set forth herein is specifically annulled.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Carrier” means any stock company, mutual company, or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange authorized to write or carry on the business of workers' compensation insurance in this state. Whenever required by the context, the term “carrier” shall be deemed to include duly qualified self-insureds or self-insured groups;

“Child” means a natural child, a posthumous child, a child legally adopted prior to injury of the employee, a stepchild, an acknowledged illegitimate child of the deceased or of the spouse of the deceased, and a foster child;

“Commission” means the Workers' Compensation Commission;

“Compensable injury” means:

An accidental injury causing internal or external physical harm to the body or accidental injury to prosthetic appliances, including eyeglasses, contact lenses, or hearing aids, arising out of and in the course of employment and which requires medical services or results in disability or death. An injury is “accidental” only if it is caused by a specific incident and is identifiable by time and place of occurrence;

An injury causing internal or external physical harm to the body and arising out of and in the course of employment if it is not caused by a specific incident or is not identifiable by time and place of occurrence, if the injury is:

Caused by rapid repetitive motion. Carpal tunnel syndrome is specifically categorized as a compensable injury falling within this definition;

A back or neck injury which is not caused by a specific incident or which is not identifiable by time and place of occurrence; or

Hearing loss which is not caused by a specific incident or which is not identifiable by time and place of occurrence;

Mental illness as set out in § 11-9-113;

Heart or cardiovascular injury, accident, or disease as set out in § 11-9-114;

A hernia as set out in § 11-9-523; or

An adverse reaction experienced by any employee of the Department of Health or any employee of a hospital licensed by the Department of Health related to vaccination with Vaccinia vaccines for smallpox, including the Dryvax vaccine, regardless of whether the adverse reaction is the result of voluntary action by the injured employee.

“Compensable injury” does not include:

Injury to any active participant in assaults or combats which, although they may occur in the workplace, are the result of nonemployment-related hostility or animus of one, both, or all of the combatants and which assault or combat amounts to a deviation from customary duties; furthermore, except for innocent victims, injuries caused by horseplay shall not be considered to be compensable injuries;

Injury incurred while engaging in or performing or as the result of engaging in or performing any recreational or social activities for the employee's personal pleasure;

Injury which was inflicted upon the employee at a time when employment services were not being performed or before the employee was hired or after the employment relationship was terminated; or

Injury where the accident was substantially occasioned by the use of alcohol, illegal drugs, or prescription drugs used in contravention of physician's orders.

The presence of alcohol, illegal drugs, or prescription drugs used in contravention of a physician's orders shall create a rebuttable presumption that the injury or accident was substantially occasioned by the use of alcohol, illegal drugs, or prescription drugs used in contravention of physician's orders.

Every employee is deemed by his or her performance of services to have impliedly consented to reasonable and responsible testing by properly trained medical or law enforcement personnel for the presence of any of the aforementioned substances in the employee's body.

An employee shall not be entitled to compensation unless it is proved by a preponderance of the evidence that the alcohol, illegal drugs, or prescription drugs utilized in contravention of the physician's orders did not substantially occasion the injury or accident.

The definition of “compensable injury” as set forth in this subdivision (4) shall not be deemed to limit or abrogate the right to recover for mental injuries as set forth in § 11-9-113 or occupational diseases as set forth in § 11-9-601 et seq.

A compensable injury must be established by medical evidence supported by objective findings as defined in subdivision (16) of this section.

Burden of Proof. The burden of proof of a compensable injury shall be on the employee and shall be as follows:

For injuries falling within the definition of compensable injury under subdivision (4)(A)(i) of this section, the burden of proof shall be a preponderance of the evidence; or

For injuries falling within the definition of compensable injury under subdivision (4)(A)(ii) of this section, the burden of proof shall be by a preponderance of the evidence, and the resultant condition is compensable only if the alleged compensable injury is the major cause of the disability or need for treatment.

Benefits.

When an employee is determined to have a compensable injury, the employee is entitled to medical and temporary disability as provided by this chapter.

Permanent benefits shall be awarded only upon a determination that the compensable injury was the major cause of the disability or impairment.

If any compensable injury combines with a preexisting disease or condition or the natural process of aging to cause or prolong disability or a need for treatment, permanent benefits shall be payable for the resultant condition only if the compensable injury is the major cause of the permanent disability or need for treatment.

Under this subdivision (4)(F), benefits shall not be payable for a condition which results from a nonwork-related independent intervening cause following a compensable injury which causes or prolongs disability or a need for treatment. A nonwork-related independent intervening cause does not require negligence or recklessness on the part of a claimant.

Nothing in this section shall limit the payment of rehabilitation benefits or benefits for disfigurement as set forth in this chapter;

“Compensation” means the money allowance payable to the employee or to his or her dependents and includes the allowances provided for in § 11-9-509 and funeral expenses;

“Death” means only death resulting from compensable injury as defined in subdivision (4) of this section;

“Department” means the State Insurance Department;

“Disability” means incapacity because of compensable injury to earn, in the same or any other employment, the wages which the employee was receiving at the time of the compensable injury;

“Employee” means an individual, including a minor, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed in the service of an employer under a contract of hire or apprenticeship, written or oral, expressed or implied, and the individual's employment status has been determined by consideration of the twenty-factor test required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

The term “employee” shall not include:

An individual who is both a licensee as defined in § 17-42-103 and a qualified real estate agent as that term is defined in section 3508(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, including all regulations thereunder;

An individual whose employment is casual and not in the course of the trade, business, profession, or occupation of his or her employer; or

An individual who is required to perform work for a municipality, county, state, or the United States Government upon having been convicted of a criminal offense or while incarcerated.

Any individual holding from the commission a current certification of noncoverage under this chapter shall be conclusively presumed not to be an employee for purposes of this chapter or otherwise during the term of his or her certification or any renewals thereof or until he or she elects otherwise, whichever time period is shorter.

Any reference to an employee who has been injured, when that employee is dead, shall also include his or her legal representative, dependents, and other persons to whom compensation may be payable;

“Employer” means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation carrying on any employment, the receiver or trustee of the same, or the legal representative of a deceased employer;

“Employment” means:

Every employment in the state in which three (3) or more employees are regularly employed by the same employer in the course of business except:

An employee employed as a domestic servant in or about a private home;

An employee employed to do gardening, maintenance, repair, remodeling, or similar work in or about the private home or residence of the person employing the employee;

Agricultural farm labor;

The State of Arkansas and each of the political subdivisions thereof except as provided by §§ 6-17-1401 — 6-17-1405, 14-26-101 — 14-26-104, 14-60-101 — 14-60-104, 19-10-101 — 19-10-103, 19-10-202 — 19-10-210, 19-10-401 — 19-10-406, and 21-5-601 — 21-5-610;

A person for whom a rule of liability for injury or death arising out of and in the course of employment is provided by the laws of the United States;

A person performing services for any nonprofit religious, charitable, or relief organization;

Any person engaged in the vending, selling, offering for sale, or delivery directly to the general public of any newspapers, magazines, or periodicals or any person acting as sales agent or distributor as an independent contractor of or for any newspaper, magazine, or periodical; and

Any individual who is both a licensee as defined in § 17-42-103 and a qualified real estate agent as that term is defined in section 3508(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, including all regulations thereunder;

Every employment in which two (2) or more employees are employed by any person engaged in building or building repair work;

Every employment in which one (1) or more employees are employed by a contractor who subcontracts any part of his or her contract; and

Every employment in which one (1) or more employees are employed by a subcontractor;

“Healing period” means that period for healing of an injury resulting from an accident;

“Insurance Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of the State of Arkansas;

“Major cause” means more than fifty percent (50%) of the cause.

A finding of major cause shall be established according to the preponderance of the evidence;

“Medical services” means those services specified in § 11-9-508;

“Objective findings” are those findings which cannot come under the voluntary control of the patient.

When determining physical or anatomical impairment, neither a physician, any other medical provider, an administrative law judge, the Workers' Compensation Commission, nor the courts may consider complaints of pain.

For the purpose of making physical or anatomical impairment ratings to the spine, straight-leg-raising tests or range-of-motion tests shall not be considered objective findings.

Objective evidence necessary to prove physical or anatomical impairment in occupational hearing loss cases may be established by medically recognized and accepted clinical diagnostic methodologies, including, but not limited to, audiological tests that measure air and bone conduction thresholds and speech discrimination ability.

Any difference in the baseline hearing levels must be confirmed with a subsequent test within the next four (4) weeks but not before five (5) days and being adjusted for presbycusis.

Medical opinions addressing compensability and permanent impairment must be stated within a reasonable degree of medical certainty;

“State average weekly wage” means the state average weekly wage determined annually by the Division of Workforce Services in the preceding calendar year pursuant to § 11-10-502.

If, for any reason, the determination is not available, the commission shall determine the wage annually after reasonable investigation and public hearing;

“Time of accident” or “date of accident” means the time or date of the occurrence of the accidental incident from which compensable injury, disability, or death results;

“Wages” means the money rate at which the service rendered is recompensed under the contract of hiring in force at the time of the accident, including the reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging, or similar advantage received from the employer and includes the amount of tips required to be reported by the employer pursuant to section 6053 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto or the amount of actual tips reported, whichever amount is greater; and

“Widow” shall include only the decedent's legal wife, living with or dependent for support upon him at the time of his death.

“Widower” shall include only the decedent's legal husband, living with or dependent for support upon her at the time of her death.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 2, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 2; 1979, No. 119, § 1; 1981, No. 290, § 1; 1983, No. 444, § 1; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1302; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 2; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 2; 1995, No. 919, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 479, § 8; 1997, No. 832, § 1, 2; 1999, No. 20, § 1; 2001, No. 1757, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1237, § 1; 2005, No. 1250, § 1; 2005, No. 1692, § 1; 2007, No. 546, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 170; 2019, No. 1055, §§ 4, 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 2. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Subdivision (5)(C), as originally enacted by Acts 1993, No. 796, § 2, began:

“Any and all prior decisions by the Commission and the Courts inconsistent with the definition of compensable injury as herein set forth are hereby specifically annulled, repealed, and held for naught.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (17)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1055 rewrote (9)(A); added (9)(B)(ii) and (9)(B)(iii) and added the (9)(B)(i) designation; and substituted “An individual” for “any individual” in (9)(B)(i).

U.S. Code.

Section 3508 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (9)(B) and (11)(A), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3508.

Section 6053 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, referred to in (19), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 6053.

11-9-103. Applicability.

Every employer and every employee, unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall be bound thereby. However, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to conflict with any valid act of Congress governing the liability of employers for injuries received by their employees.

This chapter shall apply only to claims for injuries and death based upon accidents which occur from and after December 2, 1948.

The Workers' Compensation Law in effect prior to December 2, 1948, shall govern all rights in respect to claims for injuries and death based upon accidents occurring prior to the effective date of this chapter.

For purposes of this chapter, employment status as an employee or independent contractor is determined by consideration of the twenty-factor test required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 3, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1303; Acts 2019, No. 1055, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (d).

11-9-104. Effect of unconstitutionality.

If any part of this chapter is adjudged unconstitutional by the courts and the adjudication has the effect of invalidating any payment of compensation under this chapter, the period intervening between the time the injury was sustained and the time of the adjudication shall not be computed as part of the time prescribed by law for the commencement of any action against the employer in respect of the injury, but the amount of any compensation paid under this chapter on account of the injury shall be deducted from the amount of damages awarded in the action in respect to the injury.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 48, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1349.

11-9-105. Remedies exclusive — Exception.

The rights and remedies granted to an employee subject to the provisions of this chapter, on account of injury or death, shall be exclusive of all other rights and remedies of the employee, his legal representative, dependents, next of kin, or anyone otherwise entitled to recover damages from the employer, or any principal, officer, director, stockholder, or partner acting in his or her capacity as an employer, or prime contractor of the employer, on account of the injury or death, and the negligent acts of a coemployee shall not be imputed to the employer. No role, capacity, or persona of any employer, principal, officer, director, or stockholder other than that existing in the role of employer of the employee shall be relevant for consideration for purposes of this chapter, and the remedies and rights provided by this chapter shall in fact be exclusive regardless of the multiple roles, capacities, or personas the employer may be deemed to have.

However, if an employer fails to secure the payment of compensation as required by this chapter, an injured employee, or his or her legal representative in case death results from the injury, may, at his option, elect to claim compensation under this chapter or to maintain a legal action in court for damages on account of the injury or death.

In such action it shall not be necessary to plead or prove freedom from contributory negligence, nor may the defendant-employer plead as a defense that the injury was caused by the negligence of a fellow servant, that the employee assumed the risk of his or her employment, or that the injury was due to the contributory negligence of the employee.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 4, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1304; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Cross References.

Third party liability, § 11-9-410.